Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201160-1409
Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing
Fund; created; collections; disbursements; investment; audited.

The Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund is created. All fees
collected under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act shall be remitted
by the board, as collected, to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.
Such fund shall be appropriated by the Legislature for the operations of the
Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board and shall be paid out from
time to time by warrants of the Director of Administrative Services on the
State Treasurer for authorized expenditures upon duly itemized vouchers executed
as provided by law and approved by the chairperson of the board or the executive
secretary, except that transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature through June 30, 2011. The expenses
of conducting the office must always be kept within the income collected and
reported to the State Treasurer by such board. Such office and expense thereof
shall not be supported or paid from the General Fund, and all money deposited
in the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund shall be expended only
for such office and expense thereof and, unless determined by the board, it
shall not be required to expend any funds to any person or any other governmental
agency.

Any money in the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. The fund shall be audited by
the Auditor of Public Accounts at
such time as he or she determines necessary.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 9, p. 1019;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 60, p. 2382;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 5;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 8;

Laws 1978, LB 248, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 63;

Laws 2002, LB 1310, § 6;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 36;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 65;

Laws 2011, LB337, § 3.
April 27, 2011
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.